Vermont, session 2025-2026, H393.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1390 is added to read:
§ 1390. PROHIBITION ON REQUIRING FACE MASKS
(a) No public school, independent school, postsecondary school, tutorial
program, or approved education program may require or mandate any student,
employee, or member of the public to wear a face mask or covering with the
intent to prevent or minimize the spread of any pathogen as a condition for in-
person attendance.
(b) A person who has been injured by a violation of this section may bring
an action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court for damages, injunctive
relief, punitive damages in the case of an intentional violation, and reasonable
costs and attorney’s fees.
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 9 is amended to read:
§ 9. EMERGENCY POWERS OF GOVERNOR
Subject to the provisions of this chapter, in the event of an all-hazards event
in or directed upon the United States or Canada that causes or may cause
substantial damage or injury to persons or property within the State in any
manner, the Governor may declare a state of emergency within the entire State
or any portion or portions of the State. Thereafter, the Governor shall have and
may exercise for as long as the Governor determines the emergency to exist the
following additional powers within such area or areas:
VT LEG #380144 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.393
2025 Page 3 of 3
* * *
(4) To employ such measures and give such directions to the State or
local boards of health as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of
securing compliance with the provisions of this chapter; provided, however,
any such measures or directions shall comply with 16 V.S.A. § 1390.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380144 v.4